Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1001.01
Department of Health and Human Services; rules and regulations; promulgate.

For the purpose of adding to the security and social adjustment of former and potential recipients of assistance to the aged, blind, and disabled, and of medical assistance, the Department of Health and Human Services is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations providing for services to such persons.

Laws 1969, c. 558, § 1, p. 2274;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 305;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 264.

Regulations adopted hereunder provide appeal forms may be filed with the county division and that place of hearing shall be the county in which appellant resides. Downer v. Ihms, 192 Neb. 594, 223 N.W.2d 148 (1974).